Utah statutes.
78B-2-212.   Adverse possession -- Under claim not founded on written instrument or judgment.

Where it appears that there has been an actual continued occupation of land under claim of title, exclusive of any other right, but not founded upon a written instrument, judgment or decree, the land actually occupied and no other, is considered to have been held adversely.

